Virginia statutes. Title 8.9A. Commercial Code — Secured Transactions.
Effectiveness and Attachment.

§ 8.9A-201.
General effectiveness of security agreement.

General effectiveness. Except as otherwise provided in the Uniform Commercial Code, a security agreement is effective according to its terms between the parties, against purchasers of the collateral, and against creditors.

Applicable consumer laws and other law. A transaction subject to this title is subject to any applicable rule of law which establishes a different rule for consumers.

Other applicable law controls. In case of conflict between this title and a rule of law, statute, or regulation described in subsection (b), the rule of law, statute, or regulation controls. Failure to comply with a statute or regulation described in subsection (b) has only the effect the statute or regulation specifies.

Further deference to other applicable law. This title does not:

validate any rate, charge, agreement, or practice that violates a rule of law, statute, or regulation described in subsection (b); or

extend the application of the rule of law, statute, or regulation to a transaction not otherwise subject to it.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 6-551, 6-552; 1964, c. 219, §§ 8.9-201, 8.9-203; 1973, c. 509; 1984, c. 613; 1996, c. 216; 2000, c. 1007.

Effective date.

This title became effective July 1, 2001.

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 18. Enforcement of Judgments and Decrees. § 18.03 Equity. Bryson.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 8A-901 General Security Agreement.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Assignments, § 9; 3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 99.

§ 8.9A-202.
Title to collateral immaterial.

Except as otherwise provided with respect to consignments or sales of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes, the provisions of this title with regard to rights and obligations apply whether title to collateral is in the secured party or the debtor.

History.

1964, c. 219, § 8.9-202; 2000, c. 1007.

Law Review.

For comment on cumulative remedies under Article 9 of the UCC, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 213 (1972).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 99; 15 M.J. Recording Acts, § 10.

§ 8.9A-203.
Attachment and enforceability of security interest; proceeds, supporting obligations; formal requisites.

Attachment. A security interest attaches to collateral when it becomes enforceable against the debtor with respect to the collateral, unless an agreement expressly postpones the time of attachment.

Enforceability. Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) through (i), a security interest is enforceable against the debtor and third parties with respect to the collateral only if:

value has been given;

the debtor has rights in the collateral or the power to transfer rights in the collateral to a secured party; and

one of the following conditions is met:

the debtor has authenticated a security agreement that provides a description of the collateral and, if the security interest covers timber to be cut, a description of the land concerned;

the collateral is not a certificated security and is in the possession of the secured party under §

8.9A-313

pursuant to the debtor’s security agreement;

the collateral is a certificated security in registered form and the security certificate has been delivered to the secured party under §

8.8A-301

pursuant to the debtor’s security agreement; or

the collateral is deposit accounts, electronic chattel paper, investment property, letter-of-credit rights, or electronic documents, and the secured party has control under §§

8.7-106

,

8.9A-104

,

8.9A-105

,

8.9A-106

, or §

8.9A-107

pursuant to the debtor’s security agreement.

Other Uniform Commercial Code provisions. Subsection (b) is subject to §

8.4-210

on the security interest of a collecting bank, §

8.5A-118

on the security interest of a letter-of-credit issuer or nominated person, §

8.9A-110

on a security interest arising under Title 8.2 or Title 8.2A, and §

8.9A-206

on security interests in investment property.

When person becomes bound by another person’s security agreement. A person becomes bound as debtor by a security agreement entered into by another person if, by operation of law other than this title or by contract:

the security agreement becomes effective to create a security interest in the person’s property; or

the person becomes generally obligated for the obligations of the other person, including the obligation secured under the security agreement, and acquires or succeeds to all or substantially all of the assets of the other person.

Effect of new debtor becoming bound. If a new debtor becomes bound as debtor by a security agreement entered into by another person:

the agreement satisfies subdivision (b) (3) with respect to existing or after-acquired property of the new debtor to the extent the property is described in the agreement; and

another agreement is not necessary to make a security interest in the property enforceable.

Proceeds and supporting obligations. The attachment of a security interest in collateral gives the secured party the rights to proceeds provided by §

8.9A-315

and is also attachment of a security interest in a supporting obligation for the collateral.

Lien securing right to payment. The attachment of a security interest in a right to payment or performance secured by a security interest or other lien on personal or real property is also attachment of a security interest in the security interest, mortgage, or other lien.

Security entitlement carried in securities account. The attachment of a security interest in a securities account is also attachment of a security interest in the security entitlements carried in the securities account.

Commodity contracts carried in commodity account. The attachment of a security interest in a commodity account is also attachment of a security interest in the commodity contracts carried in the commodity account.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-551; 1964, c. 219, § 8.9-203; 1973, c. 509; 1984, c. 613; 1996, c. 216, § 8.9-115; 2000, c. 1007; 2004, c. 200.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 200 inserted “or electronic documents” and “8.7-106” in paragraph (b)(3)(D); and made a minor stylistic change.

Law Review.

For survey on commercial law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 523 (1989).

Research References.

Enforcement of Judgments and Liens in Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 10. Foreclosure of a Deed of Trust and a UCC Security Interest.
§ 10.6 Foreclosing a UCC Security Interest. Rendleman.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Assignments, §§ 17-19; 2A M.J. Assignments for the Benefit of Creditors, § 33.

§ 8.9A-204.
After-acquired property; future advances.

After-acquired collateral. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), a security agreement may create or provide for a security interest in after-acquired collateral.

When after-acquired property clause not effective. A security interest does not attach under a term constituting an after-acquired property clause to:

consumer goods, other than an accession when given as additional security, unless the debtor acquires rights in them within ten days after the secured party gives value; or

a commercial tort claim.

Future advances and other value. A security agreement may provide that collateral secures, or that accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes are sold in connection with, future advances or other value, whether or not the advances or value are given pursuant to commitment.

History.

1964, c. 219, § 8.9-204; 1973, c. 509; 2000, c. 1007.

Law Review.

For article, “Revamping Consumer-Credit Contract Law,” see 68 Va. L. Rev. 1333 (1982).

For article, “The Purchase Money Security Interest in Inventory Versus the After-Acquired Property Interest — A ‘No Win’ Situation,” see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 235 (1986).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Assignments, § 24; 2A M.J. Assignments for the Benefit of Creditors, § 3.

§ 8.9A-204.1.
Security interests in consumer goods.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the law to the contrary, a seller may take a security interest only in the goods sold; provided, however, this section shall apply only to the sale of consumer goods as defined in §

8.9A-102

(23). Where the unpaid debts from two or more sales of consumer goods are consolidated into one debt payable on a single schedule of payments, and the consolidated debt is secured by security interests in the consumer goods sold, the payments made by the debtor under the consolidated schedule may be applied to the payment of the debts arising from the sales either (1) in the order in which the sales were made, starting with the first sale, or (2) in the same proportion as the original debts arising from the various sales bear to one another. To the extent debts are paid according to this section, security interests in the consumer goods sold will terminate as the debt originally incurred with respect to each item is paid.

This section shall not apply to a sale of consumer goods purchased pursuant to an open-end credit plan, when previously purchased consumer goods were purchased pursuant to such plan. This section shall not apply to a security interest in a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer which may be the subject of a certificate of title under Title 46.2.

A security interest created in violation of this section is void.

History.

2000, c. 1007.

Editor’s note.

The uniform act does not contain a section conforming to §

8.9A-204.1

, referring to security interests in consumer goods.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Assignments, § 25.

§ 8.9A-205.
Use or disposition of collateral permissible.

When security interest not invalid or fraudulent. A security interest is not invalid or fraudulent against creditors solely because:

the debtor has the right or ability to:

use, commingle, or dispose of all or part of the collateral, including returned or repossessed goods;

collect, compromise, enforce, or otherwise deal with collateral;

accept the return of collateral or make repossessions; or

use, commingle, or dispose of proceeds; or

the secured party fails to require the debtor to account for proceeds or replace collateral.

Requirements of possession not relaxed. This section does not relax the requirements of possession if attachment, perfection, or enforcement of a security interest depends upon possession of the collateral by the secured party.

History.

1964, c. 219, § 8.9-205; 1973; c. 509; 2000, c. 1007.

Research References.

Enforcement of Judgments and Liens in Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 11. Fraudulent and Voluntary Conveyances. § 11.2 Intended Fraudulent Conveyances. Rendleman.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Assignments, § 25.

§ 8.9A-206.
Security interest arising in purchase or delivery of financial asset.

Security interest when person buys through securities intermediary. A security interest in favor of a securities intermediary attaches to a person’s security entitlement if:

the person buys a financial asset through the securities intermediary in a transaction in which the person is obligated to pay the purchase price to the securities intermediary at the time of the purchase; and

the securities intermediary credits the financial asset to the buyer’s securities account before the buyer pays the securities intermediary.

Security interest secures obligation to pay for financial asset. The security interest described in subsection (a) secures the person’s obligation to pay for the financial asset.

Security interest in payment against delivery transaction. A security interest in favor of a person that delivers a certificated security or other financial asset represented by a writing attaches to the security or other financial asset if:

the security or other financial asset:

in the ordinary course of business is transferred by delivery with any necessary endorsement or assignment; and

is delivered under an agreement between persons in the business of dealing with such securities or financial assets; and

the agreement calls for delivery against payment.

Security interest secures obligation to pay for delivery. The security interest described in subsection (c) secures the obligation to make payment for the delivery.

History.

1996, c. 216, § 8.9-116; 2000, c. 1007.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 99, 101.1.